test/src/morphology/V-soodw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - sǭdõ: # Verb 8 'eng /est saada/fin' - full paradigm
     sǭdõ+V+Inf: sǭdõ
     sǭdõ+V+Ger: sǭdsõ
     sǭdõ+V+Sup: sǭmõ
     sǭdõ+V+Sup+Ine: sǭmõõs
     sǭdõ+V+Sup+Ela: sǭmõõst
     sǭdõ+V+Sup+Tra: sǭmõõks
     sǭdõ+V+Sup+Abe: sǭmõõt
     sǭdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sǭb
     sǭdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sǭtõ
     sǭdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sǭbõd
     sǭdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sai
     sǭdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [saitõ, sāita]
     sǭdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [saitõ, sāita]
     sǭdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: sǭ
     sǭdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: sǭks
     sǭdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: sǭ
     sǭdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: sǭ
     sǭdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: sǭgid
     sǭdõ+V+Jus+Sg3: sǭgõ
     sǭdõ+V+QuoSg3: sǭji
     sǭdõ+V+ActPrfPrc: sǭnd
     sǭdõ+V+PssPrfPrc: sǭdõd
